Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.170

Town treasurer—Duties.

The town treasurer shall receive and safely keep all money which comes into his or her hands as treasurer, for all of which he or she shall give duplicate receipts, one of which shall be filed with the clerk. He or she shall pay out the money on warrants signed by the mayor and countersigned by the clerk and not otherwise. He or she shall make monthly settlements with the clerk.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2058; 1965 c 7 s 35.27.170. Prior: 1961 c 89 s 6; prior: 1921 c 24 s 1, part; 1890 p 209 s 168, part; RRS s 9187, part.]